Utah statutes.
57-1-20.   Transfers in trust of real property -- Purposes -- Effect.

Transfers in trust of real property may be made to secure the performance of an obligation of the trustor or any other person named in the trust deed to a beneficiary. All right, title, interest and claim in and to the trust property acquired by the trustor, or the trustor's successors in interest, subsequent to the execution of the trust deed, shall inure to the trustee as security for the obligation or obligations for which the trust property is conveyed as if acquired before execution of the trust deed.



Amended by Chapter 236, 2001 General Session

